New Jersey, session 222, A1760.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     Employment is crucial for individuals returning from incarceration to their communities.  Employed individuals are significantly less likely to return to incarceration post-release because employment enables successful reintegration to society; b.    Recently-incarcerated individuals face barriers to entry for quality employment, that often limit the persons ability to obtain employment and may discourage the individual from even seeking quality of life improvements; c.     One barrier that recently-incarcerated individuals face is the stigma associated with formerly incarcerated persons.  Employers may not even consider a candidate with a conviction; and d.    The lack of education is another barrier to employment for recently incarcerated individuals.  Many recently-incarcerated individuals do not have the educational opportunities required for an effective return to society. e.     Assisting individuals who were recently-incarcerated in obtaining employment benefits all residents of the State because it increases State-wide productivity and economic prosperity. 2.    1a.1 The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall identify employment opportunities for persons returning to the workforce after incarceration, which have minimal barriers of entry and which have a demand for workers.  The department shall conspicuously post, on an ongoing basis, notification of these employment opportunities on its website. 1b. Each prisoner reentry program, organization, or other reentry entity operated by the State, a county or municipality, other local unit, or which otherwise receives State funds shall report to the department on a quarterly basis employment partnerships, opportunities, and any other employment-related data necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development.1 3.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.